Arkansas, session 2025, SB576.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 20-77-148(b)(1), concerning the
requirements for coverage of a continuous glucose monitor, is amended to read
as follows:
(1) Either:
(A) A presence of type 1 diabetes or any other type of
diabetes with:
(i) The use of insulin more than two (2) times daily
in accordance with Medicare policy; or
(ii) Evidence of Level 2 or Level 3 hypoglycemia; or
(B) Diagnosis of glycogen storage disease type 1a; and






*JMB499*
03/31/2025 9:16:51 AM JMB499